Ohio, session 136, HB165.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 3314.03, 3326.11, and 3328.24 be 5
amended and section 3319.2214 of the Revised Code be enacted to 6
read as follows: 7
Sec. 3314.03. A copy of every contract entered into under 8
this section shall be filed with the director of education and 9
workforce. The department of education and workforce shall make 10
available on its web site a copy of every approved, executed 11
contract filed with the director under this section. 12
(A) Each contract entered into between a sponsor and the 13
governing authority of a community school shall specify the 14
following: 15
(1) That the school shall be established as either of the 16
following: 17

H. B. No. 165 Page 2
As Introduced
(a) A nonprofit corporation established under Chapter 18
1702. of the Revised Code, if established prior to April 8, 19
2003; 20
(b) A public benefit corporation established under Chapter 21
1702. of the Revised Code, if established after April 8, 2003. 22
(2) The education program of the school, including the 23
school's mission, the characteristics of the students the school 24
is expected to attract, the ages and grades of students, and the 25
focus of the curriculum; 26
(3) The academic goals to be achieved and the method of 27
measurement that will be used to determine progress toward those 28
goals, which shall include the statewide achievement 29
assessments; 30
(4) Performance standards, including but not limited to 31
all applicable report card measures set forth in section 3302.03 32
or 3314.017 of the Revised Code, by which the success of the 33
school will be evaluated by the sponsor; 34
(5) The admission standards of section 3314.06 of the 35
Revised Code and, if applicable, section 3314.061 of the Revised 36
Code; 37
(6)(a) Dismissal procedures; 38
(b) A requirement that the governing authority adopt an 39
attendance policy that includes a procedure for automatically 40
withdrawing a student from the school if the student without a 41
legitimate excuse fails to participate in seventy-two 42
consecutive hours of the learning opportunities offered to the 43
student. 44
(7) The ways by which the school will achieve racial and 45

H. B. No. 165 Page 3
As Introduced
ethnic balance reflective of the community it serves; 46
(8) Requirements for financial audits by the auditor of 47
state. The contract shall require financial records of the 48
school to be maintained in the same manner as are financial 49
records of school districts, pursuant to rules of the auditor of 50
state. Audits shall be conducted in accordance with section 51
117.10 of the Revised Code. 52
(9) An addendum to the contract outlining the facilities 53
to be used that contains at least the following information: 54
(a) A detailed description of each facility used for 55
instructional purposes; 56
(b) The annual costs associated with leasing each facility 57
that are paid by or on behalf of the school; 58
(c) The annual mortgage principal and interest payments 59
that are paid by the school; 60
(d) The name of the lender or landlord, identified as 61
such, and the lender's or landlord's relationship to the 62
operator, if any. 63
(10) Qualifications of employees, including both of the 64
following: 65
(a) A requirement that the school's classroom teachers be 66
licensed in accordance with sections 3319.22 to 3319.31 of the 67
Revised Code, except that a community school may engage 68
noncertificated persons to teach up to twelve hours or forty 69
hours per week pursuant to section 3319.301 of the Revised Code; 70
(b) A prohibition against the school employing an 71
individual described in section 3314.104 of the Revised Code in 72
any position. 73

H. B. No. 165 Page 4
As Introduced
(11) That the school will comply with the following 74
requirements: 75
(a) The school will provide learning opportunities to a 76
minimum of twenty-five students for a minimum of nine hundred 77
twenty hours per school year. 78
(b) The governing authority will purchase liability 79
insurance, or otherwise provide for the potential liability of 80
the school. 81
(c) The school will be nonsectarian in its programs, 82
admission policies, employment practices, and all other 83
operations, and will not be operated by a sectarian school or 84
religious institution. 85
(d) The school will comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 86
109.65, 121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 3301.0710, 87
3301.0711, 3301.0712, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 88
3313.472, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 89
3313.608, 3313.609, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 90
3313.6024, 3313.6025, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.643, 91
3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 92
3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 93
3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 94
3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 95
3313.80, 3313.814, 3313.816, 3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 96
3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 97
3319.0812, 3319.2214, 3319.238, 3319.318, 3319.321, 3319.324, 98
3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.46, 3319.614, 99
3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.13, 100
3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 3322.20, 3322.24, 101
3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 5502.262, 5502.703, and 102
5705.391 and Chapters 117., 1347., 2744., 3365., 3742., 4112., 103

H. B. No. 165 Page 5
As Introduced
4123., 4141., and 4167. of the Revised Code as if it were a 104
school district and will comply with section 3301.0714 of the 105
Revised Code in the manner specified in section 3314.17 of the 106
Revised Code. 107
(e) The school shall comply with Chapter 102. and section 108
2921.42 of the Revised Code. 109
(f) The school will comply with sections 3313.61, 110
3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.617, 3313.618, and 3313.6114 of the 111
Revised Code, except that for students who enter ninth grade for 112
the first time before July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 113
3313.61 and 3313.611 of the Revised Code that a person must 114
successfully complete the curriculum in any high school prior to 115
receiving a high school diploma may be met by completing the 116
curriculum adopted by the governing authority of the community 117
school rather than the curriculum specified in Title XXXIII of 118
the Revised Code or any rules of the department. Beginning with 119
students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after 120
July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 3313.61 and 3313.611 121
of the Revised Code that a person must successfully complete the 122
curriculum of a high school prior to receiving a high school 123
diploma shall be met by completing the requirements prescribed 124
in section 3313.6027 and division (C) of section 3313.603 of the 125
Revised Code, unless the person qualifies under division (D) or 126
(F) of that section. Each school shall comply with the plan for 127
awarding high school credit based on demonstration of subject 128
area competency, and beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, 129
with the updated plan that permits students enrolled in seventh 130
and eighth grade to meet curriculum requirements based on 131
subject area competency adopted by the department under 132
divisions (J)(1) and (2) of section 3313.603 of the Revised 133
Code. Beginning with the 2018-2019 school year, the school shall 134

H. B. No. 165 Page 6
As Introduced
comply with the framework for granting units of high school 135
credit to students who demonstrate subject area competency 136
through work-based learning experiences, internships, or 137
cooperative education developed by the department under division 138
(J)(3) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. 139
(g) The school governing authority will submit within four 140
months after the end of each school year a report of its 141
activities and progress in meeting the goals and standards of 142
divisions (A)(3) and (4) of this section and its financial 143
status to the sponsor and the parents of all students enrolled 144
in the school. 145
(h) The school, unless it is an internet- or computer- 146
based community school, will comply with section 3313.801 of the 147
Revised Code as if it were a school district. 148
(i) If the school is the recipient of moneys from a grant 149
awarded under the federal race to the top program, Division (A), 150
Title XIV, Sections 14005 and 14006 of the "American Recovery 151
and Reinvestment Act of 2009," Pub. L. No. 111-5, 123 Stat. 115, 152
the school will pay teachers based upon performance in 153
accordance with section 3317.141 and will comply with section 154
3319.111 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. 155
(j) If the school operates a preschool program that is 156
licensed by the department under sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of 157
the Revised Code, the school shall comply with sections 3301.50 158
to 3301.59 of the Revised Code and the minimum standards for 159
preschool programs prescribed in rules adopted by the department 160
of children and youth under section 3301.53 of the Revised Code. 161
(k) The school will comply with sections 3313.6021 and 162
3313.6023 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district 163

H. B. No. 165 Page 7
As Introduced
unless it is either of the following: 164
(i) An internet- or computer-based community school; 165
(ii) A community school in which a majority of the 166
enrolled students are children with disabilities as described in 167
division (B)(2) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code. 168
(l) The school will comply with section 3321.191 of the 169
Revised Code, unless it is an internet- or computer-based 170
community school that is subject to section 3314.261 of the 171
Revised Code. 172
(12) Arrangements for providing health and other benefits 173
to employees; 174
(13) The length of the contract, which shall begin at the 175
beginning of an academic year. No contract shall exceed five 176
years unless such contract has been renewed pursuant to division 177
(E) of this section. 178
(14) The governing authority of the school, which shall be 179
responsible for carrying out the provisions of the contract; 180
(15) A financial plan detailing an estimated school budget 181
for each year of the period of the contract and specifying the 182
total estimated per pupil expenditure amount for each such year. 183
(16) Requirements and procedures regarding the disposition 184
of employees of the school in the event the contract is 185
terminated or not renewed pursuant to section 3314.07 of the 186
Revised Code; 187
(17) Whether the school is to be created by converting all 188
or part of an existing public school or educational service 189
center building or is to be a new start-up school, and if it is 190
a converted public school or service center building, 191

H. B. No. 165 Page 8
As Introduced
specification of any duties or responsibilities of an employer 192
that the board of education or service center governing board 193
that operated the school or building before conversion is 194
delegating to the governing authority of the community school 195
with respect to all or any specified group of employees provided 196
the delegation is not prohibited by a collective bargaining 197
agreement applicable to such employees; 198
(18) Provisions establishing procedures for resolving 199
disputes or differences of opinion between the sponsor and the 200
governing authority of the community school; 201
(19) A provision requiring the governing authority to 202
adopt a policy regarding the admission of students who reside 203
outside the district in which the school is located. That policy 204
shall comply with the admissions procedures specified in 205
sections 3314.06 and 3314.061 of the Revised Code and, at the 206
sole discretion of the authority, shall do one of the following: 207
(a) Prohibit the enrollment of students who reside outside 208
the district in which the school is located; 209
(b) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in 210
districts adjacent to the district in which the school is 211
located; 212
(c) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in any 213
other district in the state. 214
(20) A provision recognizing the authority of the 215
department to take over the sponsorship of the school in 216
accordance with the provisions of division (C) of section 217
3314.015 of the Revised Code; 218
(21) A provision recognizing the sponsor's authority to 219
assume the operation of a school under the conditions specified 220

H. B. No. 165 Page 9
As Introduced
in division (B) of section 3314.073 of the Revised Code; 221
(22) A provision recognizing both of the following: 222
(a) The authority of public health and safety officials to 223
inspect the facilities of the school and to order the facilities 224
closed if those officials find that the facilities are not in 225
compliance with health and safety laws and regulations; 226
(b) The authority of the department as the community 227
school oversight body to suspend the operation of the school 228
under section 3314.072 of the Revised Code if the department has 229
evidence of conditions or violations of law at the school that 230
pose an imminent danger to the health and safety of the school's 231
students and employees and the sponsor refuses to take such 232
action. 233
(23) A description of the learning opportunities that will 234
be offered to students including both classroom-based and non- 235
classroom-based learning opportunities that is in compliance 236
with criteria for student participation established by the 237
department under division (H)(2) of section 3314.08 of the 238
Revised Code; 239
(24) The school will comply with sections 3302.04 and 240
3302.041 of the Revised Code, except that any action required to 241
be taken by a school district pursuant to those sections shall 242
be taken by the sponsor of the school. 243
(25) Beginning in the 2006-2007 school year, the school 244
will open for operation not later than the thirtieth day of 245
September each school year, unless the mission of the school as 246
specified under division (A)(2) of this section is solely to 247
serve dropouts. In its initial year of operation, if the school 248
fails to open by the thirtieth day of September, or within one 249

H. B. No. 165 Page 10
As Introduced
year after the adoption of the contract pursuant to division (D) 250
of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code if the mission of the 251
school is solely to serve dropouts, the contract shall be void. 252
(26) Whether the school's governing authority is planning 253
to seek designation for the school as a STEM school equivalent 254
under section 3326.032 of the Revised Code; 255
(27) That the school's attendance and participation 256
policies will be available for public inspection; 257
(28) That the school's attendance and participation 258
records shall be made available to the department, auditor of 259
state, and school's sponsor to the extent permitted under and in 260
accordance with the "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act 261
of 1974," 88 Stat. 571, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as amended, and any 262
regulations promulgated under that act, and section 3319.321 of 263
the Revised Code; 264
(29) If a school operates using the blended learning 265
model, as defined in section 3301.079 of the Revised Code, all 266
of the following information: 267
(a) An indication of what blended learning model or models 268
will be used; 269
(b) A description of how student instructional needs will 270
be determined and documented; 271
(c) The method to be used for determining competency, 272
granting credit, and promoting students to a higher grade level; 273
(d) The school's attendance requirements, including how 274
the school will document participation in learning 275
opportunities; 276
(e) A statement describing how student progress will be 277

H. B. No. 165 Page 11
As Introduced
monitored; 278
(f) A statement describing how private student data will 279
be protected; 280
(g) A description of the professional development 281
activities that will be offered to teachers. 282
(30) A provision requiring that all moneys the school's 283
operator loans to the school, including facilities loans or cash 284
flow assistance, must be accounted for, documented, and bear 285
interest at a fair market rate; 286
(31) A provision requiring that, if the governing 287
authority contracts with an attorney, accountant, or entity 288
specializing in audits, the attorney, accountant, or entity 289
shall be independent from the operator with which the school has 290
contracted. 291
(32) A provision requiring the governing authority to 292
adopt an enrollment and attendance policy that requires a 293
student's parent to notify the community school in which the 294
student is enrolled when there is a change in the location of 295
the parent's or student's primary residence. 296
(33) A provision requiring the governing authority to 297
adopt a student residence and address verification policy for 298
students enrolling in or attending the school. 299
(B) The community school shall also submit to the sponsor 300
a comprehensive plan for the school. The plan shall specify the 301
following: 302
(1) The process by which the governing authority of the 303
school will be selected in the future; 304
(2) The management and administration of the school; 305

H. B. No. 165 Page 12
As Introduced
(3) If the community school is a currently existing public 306
school or educational service center building, alternative 307
arrangements for current public school students who choose not 308
to attend the converted school and for teachers who choose not 309
to teach in the school or building after conversion; 310
(4) The instructional program and educational philosophy 311
of the school; 312
(5) Internal financial controls. 313
When submitting the plan under this division, the school 314
shall also submit copies of all policies and procedures 315
regarding internal financial controls adopted by the governing 316
authority of the school. 317
(C) A contract entered into under section 3314.02 of the 318
Revised Code between a sponsor and the governing authority of a 319
community school may provide for the community school governing 320
authority to make payments to the sponsor, which is hereby 321
authorized to receive such payments as set forth in the contract 322
between the governing authority and the sponsor. The total 323
amount of such payments for monitoring, oversight, and technical 324
assistance of the school shall not exceed three per cent of the 325
total amount of payments for operating expenses that the school 326
receives from the state. 327
(D) The contract shall specify the duties of the sponsor 328
which shall be in accordance with the written agreement entered 329
into with the department under division (B) of section 3314.015 330
of the Revised Code and shall include the following: 331
(1) Monitor the community school's compliance with all 332
laws applicable to the school and with the terms of the 333
contract; 334

H. B. No. 165 Page 13
As Introduced
(2) Monitor and evaluate the academic and fiscal 335
performance and the organization and operation of the community 336
school on at least an annual basis; 337
(3) Provide technical assistance to the community school 338
in complying with laws applicable to the school and terms of the 339
contract; 340
(4) Take steps to intervene in the school's operation to 341
correct problems in the school's overall performance, declare 342
the school to be on probationary status pursuant to section 343
3314.073 of the Revised Code, suspend the operation of the 344
school pursuant to section 3314.072 of the Revised Code, or 345
terminate the contract of the school pursuant to section 3314.07 346
of the Revised Code as determined necessary by the sponsor; 347
(5) Have in place a plan of action to be undertaken in the 348
event the community school experiences financial difficulties or 349
closes prior to the end of a school year. 350
(E) Upon the expiration of a contract entered into under 351
this section, the sponsor of a community school may, with the 352
approval of the governing authority of the school, renew that 353
contract for a period of time determined by the sponsor, but not 354
ending earlier than the end of any school year, if the sponsor 355
finds that the school's compliance with applicable laws and 356
terms of the contract and the school's progress in meeting the 357
academic goals prescribed in the contract have been 358
satisfactory. Any contract that is renewed under this division 359
remains subject to the provisions of sections 3314.07, 3314.072, 360
and 3314.073 of the Revised Code. 361
(F) If a community school fails to open for operation 362
within one year after the contract entered into under this 363

H. B. No. 165 Page 14
As Introduced
section is adopted pursuant to division (D) of section 3314.02 364
of the Revised Code or permanently closes prior to the 365
expiration of the contract, the contract shall be void and the 366
school shall not enter into a contract with any other sponsor. A 367
school shall not be considered permanently closed because the 368
operations of the school have been suspended pursuant to section 369
3314.072 of the Revised Code. 370
Sec. 3319.2214. (A) Beginning July 1, 2025, each school 371
district and chartered nonpublic school shall reimburse any of 372
its employees who hold a valid license under sections 3319.22 to 373
3319.31 of the Revised Code for the full cost of completing the 374
number of graduate-level credit hours, or the equivalent number 375
of continuing education units, established under this section in 376
implicit bias training. A district or school only shall 377
reimburse an employee for training that meets the minimum 378
standards established under this section. 379
(B) The state board of education and the chancellor of 380
higher education shall establish both of the following: 381
(1) The number of graduate-level credit hours in implicit 382
bias training that is reimbursable under this section. The 383
number of credit hours shall not be less than one credit hour or 384
more than three credit hours. 385
(2) The number of continuing education units that is 386
equivalent to the number of credit hours established under 387
division (B)(1) of this section. 388
(C) The state board and the chancellor, in collaboration 389
with the department of education and workforce, shall establish 390
minimum standards for implicit bias training to be reimbursable 391
under this section. The minimum standards shall require training 392

H. B. No. 165 Page 15
As Introduced
to include at least all of the following: 393
(1) A definition of implicit bias; 394
(2) Examples of implicit bias in action; 395
(3) A method of identifying susceptibility to unwanted 396
bias; 397
(4) Voluntary evidence-based mitigation strategies. 398
(D) A local professional development committee established 399
under section 3319.22 of the Revised Code shall count implicit 400
bias training that meets the minimum standards established under 401
this section toward professional development coursework 402
requirements for teacher licensure renewal. 403
(E) The department shall reimburse each district or school 404
an amount equal to the reimbursement made by the district or 405
school to an employee under division (A) of this section minus 406
any other tuition reimbursement or professional development 407
stipend the district or school provides to the employee. 408
Sec. 3326.11. Each science, technology, engineering, and 409
mathematics school established under this chapter and its 410
governing body shall comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 109.65, 411
121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 2921.42, 2921.43, 412
3301.0714, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.14, 413
3313.15, 3313.16, 3313.18, 3313.201, 3313.26, 3313.472, 3313.48, 414
3313.481, 3313.482, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 415
3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 416
3313.6021, 3313.6023, 3313.6024, 3313.6025, 3313.6026, 417
3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.615, 418
3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 419
3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 420
3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 421

H. B. No. 165 Page 16
As Introduced
3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 3313.717, 3313.718, 422
3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 423
3313.801, 3313.814, 3313.816, 3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 424
3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 425
3319.0812, 3319.21, 3319.2214, 3319.238, 3319.318, 3319.32, 426
3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.35, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 427
3319.41, 3319.45, 3319.46, 3319.614, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 428
3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.05, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 429
3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 3321.191, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 430
3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and 431
Chapters 102., 117., 1347., 2744., 3307., 3309., 3365., 3742., 432
4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the Revised Code as if it were 433
a school district. 434
Sec. 3328.24. A college-preparatory boarding school 435
established under this chapter and its board of trustees shall 436
comply with sections 102.02, 3301.0710, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, 437
3301.0714, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 438
3313.6013, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 3313.6024, 3313.6025, 439
3313.6026, 3313.6029, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 3313.6411, 440
3313.6413, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.717, 3313.7112, 441
3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.89, 3319.073, 3319.077, 442
3319.078, 3319.2214, 3319.318, 3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 443
3319.393, 3319.46, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3323.251, 444
and 5502.262, and Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code as if the 445
school were a school district and the school's board of trustees 446
were a district board of education. 447
Section 2. That existing sections 3314.03, 3326.11, and 448
3328.24 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 449
Section 3. All items in this act are hereby appropriated 450
as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the 451

H. B. No. 165 Page 17
As Introduced
credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations 452
made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 453
2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. 454
The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to 455
any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. 456
Section 4. 457
458
1 2 3 4 5
A EDU DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION AND WORKFORCE
B General Revenue Fund
C GRF 200448 Educator Preparation $750,000 $750,000
D TOTAL GRF General Revenue Fund $750,000 $750,000
E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $750,000 $750,000
EDUCATOR PREPARATION 459
The foregoing appropriation item 200448, Educator 460
Preparation, shall be used to pay the reimbursements required by 461
division (E) of section 3319.2214 of the Revised Code. 462
Section 5. Within the limits set forth in this act, the 463
Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts 464
indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation 465
made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which 466
appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from 467
operating appropriations contained in this act shall be 468
accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all 469
applicable provisions of, the main operating appropriations act 470
of the 136th General Assembly. 471

H. B. No. 165 Page 18
As Introduced
Section 6. The General Assembly, applying the principle 472
stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that 473
amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of 474
simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, 475
presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended 476
by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the 477
sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections 478
as presented in this act: 479
Section 3314.03 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 480
214, H.B. 250, and S.B. 168, all of the 135th General Assembly. 481
Section 3326.11 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 47, 482
H.B. 214, and S.B. 168, all of the 135th General Assembly. 483
Section 3328.24 of the Revised Code as amended by both 484
H.B. 47 and H.B. 214 of the 135th General Assembly. 485